Utah statutes.
72-7-407.   Implements of husbandry -- Escort vehicle requirements -- Oversize permit -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section, "escort vehicle" means a motor vehicle, as defined under Section 41-1a-102, that has its emergency warning lights operating, and that is being used to warn approaching motorists by either preceding or following a slow or oversized vehicle, object, or implement of husbandry being moved on the highway.

(2)  An implement of husbandry being moved on a highway shall be accompanied by:

(a)  front and rear escort vehicles when the implement of husbandry is 16 feet in width or greater unless the implement of husbandry is moved by a farmer or rancher or the farmer or rancher's employees in connection with an agricultural operation; or

(b)  one or more escort vehicles when the implement of husbandry is traveling on a highway where special hazards exist related to weather, pedestrians, other traffic, or highway conditions.

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (2), a person may not move an implement of husbandry on a highway during hours of darkness without lights and reflectors as required under Section 41-6a-1608 or 41-6a-1609.

(4) (a)  Except for an implement of husbandry moved by a farmer or rancher or the farmer's or rancher's employees in connection with an agricultural operation, a person may not move an implement of husbandry on the highway without:

(i)  an oversize permit obtained under Section 72-7-406 if required;

(ii)  trained escort vehicle drivers and approved escort vehicles when required under Subsection (2); and

(iii)  compliance with the vehicle weight requirements of Section 72-7-404.

(b) (i)  The department shall issue an annual oversize permit for the purpose of allowing the movement of implements of husbandry on the highways in accordance with this chapter.

(ii)  The permit shall require the applicant to obtain verbal permission from the department for each trip involving the movement of an implement of husbandry 16 feet or greater in width.

(5)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 140, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

